Montana, session 2025, HB445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-1-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-1-102. Legislative goals for public elementary and secondary schools. It is the goal of the
legislature that Montana's public elementary and secondary school system, in cooperation with parents or
guardians, create a learning environment for each student that:
(1) develops a sound foundation for literacy and numeracy during the early years that is built upon
on and reinforced throughout the educational experience;
(2) furthers the ability to reason critically, creatively, and strategically;
(3) fosters the ability to effectively understand and communicate ideas, knowledge, and thoughts;
(4) develops a sense of personal and civic responsibility;
(5) provides an in-depth understanding of the American political, social, and economic systems
and the historical context from which they arose;
(6) provides familiarization with political, social, and economic systems found elsewhere in the
world;
(7) develops a strong work ethic, postsecondary readiness, and employment skills;
(8) encourages a healthy lifestyle; and
(9) supports instruction of financial literacy, where in which students obtain the knowledge and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 445

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 445.1
skills required to succeed financially; and
(10) provides instruction for all students in reading and writing in cursive handwriting, to develop
cognitive and fine motor skills in young students, and to ensure that all students are able to read original
documents, such as the United States constitution, which are foundational to understanding the history and
contemporary context of the nation's government."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 445